Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1605YH (6) 91 jm/md H.F. 617 Section 1. Section 403.17, subsection 14, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 14. âLow or and moderate income familiesâ means those 3 families, including single person households, earning no 4 more than eighty percent of the higher of the median family 5 income of the county or the statewide nonmetropolitan area as 6 determined by the latest United States department of housing 7 and urban development, section 8 income guidelines. 8 Sec. 2. Section 403.22, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 9 by adding the following new paragraph: 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) (a) For projects subject to 11 paragraph âaâ , if the public improvement project is related to 12 housing and residential development in an economic development 13 area containing property that has been located entirely within 14 the corporate limits of a city for twenty years or more, 15 the amount to be provided for low and moderate income family 16 housing for such projects shall not be less than an amount 17 equal to twenty percent of the original project cost, subject 18 to further reduction as provided in this subsection. 19 (b) In addition, notwithstanding subsection 5, the division 20 of the revenue under section 403.19 for each project under this 21 paragraph âdâ shall be limited to tax collections for twenty 22 fiscal years beginning with the second fiscal year after the 23 year in which the municipality first certifies to the county 24 auditor the amount of any loans, advances, indebtedness, or 25 bonds which qualify for payment from the division of the 26 revenue in connection with the project. 27 (2) For projects under this paragraph, âlow and moderate 28 income family housingâ includes housing that meets the 29 requirements of section 15.353. 30 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 31 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 32 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to revenues divided 33 for projects approved on or after the effective date of this 34 Act. 35 -1- LSB 1605YH (6) 91 jm/md 1/ 2 H.F. 617